Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-810
Abandoned or neglected pioneer cemeteries; mowing; historical and directional markers.

Any county affected by sections 12-807 to 12-810 shall provide for at least one mowing annually of such cemetery each year, and one of such mowings shall occur within a period of two weeks prior to Memorial Day. Additional mowings shall be at the discretion of the county board, and each additional mowing may be subject to a public hearing at which the need for the additional mowing shall be presented to the county board. Within five years after maintenance and preservation of such cemetery is commenced by such county, a historical marker giving the date of the establishment of the cemetery and a short history of the cemetery may be placed at the site of such cemetery. One directional marker showing the way to such cemetery may be placed on the nearest state highway to such cemetery.

Laws 1975, LB 129, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 932, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB995, § 7.